Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 4

Prohibited Acts — Enforcement

57-3-401. Transportation, possession, importation, shipment or delivery of untaxed alcoholic beverages unlawful — Penalty.

It is an offense for any person, firm or corporation, other than a common carrier or entity licensed under this title, to transport, either in person or through an agent, employee or independent contractor, untaxed alcoholic beverages or wine as defined in § 57-3-101 within, into, through or from this state in quantities in excess of five gallons (5 gals.). Except as provided in § 57-3-103(b) authorizing a person to store alcoholic beverages intended for a person's personal or social use, it is an offense for any person, firm, corporation or association to possess untaxed alcoholic beverages or wine in quantities in excess of five gallons (5 gals.). A violation of this subdivision (a)(1) is a Class E felony.

Any person, firm, corporation or association transporting any alcoholic beverages or wine within or into this state shall bear the burden of proof that the taxes imposed by this title on alcoholic beverages or wine have been paid, or, in the case of wine that is manufactured at a winemaking on premises facility licensed pursuant to § 57-3-218, that no such taxes are due. A receipt or other documentation demonstrating legal purchase or transport from an entity licensed under § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207 or § 57-3-218 shall be adequate proof that such taxes have been paid or that no such taxes are due.

It is an offense for any person, firm, corporation or association to import, ship, deliver or cause to be imported, shipped or delivered into this state any alcoholic beverages upon which the tax imposed by this title has not been paid or where such transportation is not authorized under this title to an entity possessing a license issued under this title. A violation of this subdivision (b)(1) is a Class E felony.

Except as provided in § 57-3-207 for purchases made by an individual at a winery licensed pursuant to § 57-3-207, and notwithstanding the prohibition in subdivision (b)(1), it shall be lawful for any individual to transport not more than five gallons (5 gals.) of alcoholic beverages or wine into or within this state for the personal or household use of that individual.

Acts 1947, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.22 (Williams, §§ 6648.33, 6648.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-137; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 61; 1992, ch. 608, §§ 6, 7; 2009, ch. 434, § 6; 2011, ch. 451, § 7.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 12, 17, 20.

Law Reviews.

The Wine Is In the Mail: The Twenty-First Amendment and State Laws Against the Direct Shipment of Alcoholic Beverages, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2495 (2001).

57-3-402. Importation or transportation limited.

It is unlawful, except as permitted in this chapter, for any person to import or transport, or cause to be imported or transported from any other state, territory, or country, into this state, any alcoholic beverages defined in § 57-3-101. This subsection (a) shall not apply to alcoholic beverages imported or transported into this state pursuant to former § 39-17-705(5).

Except as provided in § 57-3-217, no common carrier or other person shall bring or carry into this state for delivery or use in this state any alcoholic beverages unless the same shall be consigned to a manufacturer or wholesaler duly licensed under this chapter, or unless the alcoholic beverages shall be consigned to a post exchange, ship's service store, mess, club, commissary, or other agency under the jurisdiction of the department of defense, in which event notice of the shipment shall be given to the commission as required by § 57-3-110.

It is unlawful for any person, railroad company or other common carrier, to transport or accept delivery of alcoholic beverages, consigned to any person except those duly authorized and holding a wholesaler's license. This shall not apply to:

Shipments from a duly licensed wholesaler in this state to a retailer duly licensed or to points outside the state;

Alcoholic beverages consigned to a post exchange, ship's service store, club, commissary, or mess, or any other agency under the jurisdiction of the department of defense after notice of such shipment is given to the commission as required by § 57-3-110; or

Alcoholic beverages transported by a licensee pursuant to the rules and regulations of the commission for the purposes of conducting an educational seminar by a business licensed pursuant to § 57-3-204.

Transportation of alcoholic beverages as defined in this chapter, within, into, through or over this state in quantities in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) is permitted only in conformity with this chapter, except in counties wherein the sale of alcoholic beverages has been legalized.

No alcoholic beverages or wine may be sold or delivered to a retailer authorized to sell such alcoholic beverages or wine under this title, whether on premise or off premise, unless such alcoholic beverages have been stored or warehoused at a premises licensed by the commission pursuant to § 57-3-203 for a period of no less than twenty-four (24) hours. It is the stated purpose of this requirement to verify the legality of all alcoholic beverages or wine distributed in this state, and to facilitate the proper payment of all taxes on alcoholic beverages. This subsection (e) shall not apply to deliveries to a licensee under § 57-3-202(i), § 57-3-204(d), or § 57-3-207(r).

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 12-14; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.16, 6648.17, 6648.19 (Williams, §§ 6648.15-6648.17); Acts 1955, ch. 347, §§ 2, 2A, 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-138; Acts 1987, ch. 164, § 3; 1998, ch. 765, § 2; 2009, ch. 348, § 3; 2009, ch. 434, § 7; 2016, ch. 1068, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding allowing an in-state or out-of-state entity to ship wine directly to consumers age twenty-one years or older in this state for personal use, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 348.

Cross-References. Warning to be published by out-of-state liquor advertisers, §47-18-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1957 Tennessee Survey (James B. Earle), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1073.

Attorney General Opinions. Provision of this section prohibiting vintners from making mail order sales of wine to retail customers does not violate the commerce clause of the United States Constitution, OAG 04-010 (1/30/04).

Tennessee resident who makes an onsite purchase of wine at an out-of-state winery, is not permitted by 27 U.S.C. § 124 to use a common carrier to ship such wine back to Tennessee, OAG 09-015 (2/24/09).

57-3-403. Transportation in quantities in excess of five gallons — Bond — Bill of lading — Off-premises consumption.

The transportation of alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-3-101, within, into, through, or from this state in quantities in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) is permitted only in conformity with this section or as otherwise permitted in this chapter:

Before any person shall transport any alcoholic beverages within, into, through, or from this state, except by means of common carrier, such person shall post with the commission a bond with approved surety payable to the state of Tennessee in the penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000), upon condition that such person will not unlawfully transport or deliver any alcoholic beverages within, into, through, or from this state, and evidence that the required bond has been posted shall accompany the alcoholic beverages at all times during transportation. No such bond shall be required of any person licensed under this chapter to sell alcoholic beverages at wholesale when such alcoholic beverages are being transported in a vehicle belonging to the licensee;

Where alcoholic beverages are desired to be transported within, into, or through or from this state, such transportation shall be engaged in only when in accordance with this section or as otherwise permitted in this chapter, viz:

There shall accompany such alcoholic beverages at all times during transportation, a bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment signed by the consignor, showing an exact description of the alcoholic beverages being transported; the name and address of the consignor; the name and address of the consignee; and the route to be traveled by such vehicle while in Tennessee. Such route must be the most direct route from the consignor's place of business to the place of business of the consignee;

Vehicles transporting alcoholic beverages shall not vary from the route specified in the bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment;

The name of the consignor on any such bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment shall be the name of the true consignor of the alcoholic beverages being transported, and such consignor shall only be a person who has a legal right to make such shipment. The name of the consignee on any such bill of lading or memorandum of shipment shall be the name of the true consignee of the alcoholic beverages being transported, who has previously authorized in writing the shipment of the alcoholic beverages being transported and who has legal right to receive such alcoholic beverages at the point of destination shown on the bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment; and

The driver or person in charge of any vehicle covered by any bond posted with the commission under this section shall, when requested by any representative or agent of the commission or any person having police authority, exhibit to such person the bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment covering the cargo of such vehicle;

An alcoholic beverages wholesale licensee who also carries on a beer wholesale operation as provided by § 57-3-203(b)(2) may lawfully transport alcoholic beverages and beer in the same vehicle; provided, that all other legal requirements applicable to such transportation are satisfied.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or title 39 to the contrary, in any jurisdiction wherein the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption off the premises has been legalized, it shall be lawful to receive, possess and transport alcoholic beverages if all appropriate taxes as required by law have been paid upon such alcoholic beverages.

Acts 1945, ch. 167, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 37; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-139; Acts 1982, ch. 614, § 1; 2009, ch. 434, §§ 8, 9; 2014, ch. 554, § 25.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 15, 21, 28.

57-3-404. Regulations for purchase and sale of intoxicating liquors — Wholesalers — Check cashing — Ground floor location — Credit sales.

It is unlawful for any person in this state to buy any alcoholic beverages herein defined from any person, who, to the knowledge of the buyer, does not hold the appropriate license under the laws of this state authorizing the sale of such beverages to the buyer.

No retailer shall purchase any alcoholic beverages from anyone other than a licensed wholesaler, nor shall any wholesaler sell any alcoholic beverages to anyone other than a licensed retailer or retail food store licensed to sell wine pursuant to part 8 of this chapter or a licensed wholesaler; provided, that such alcoholic beverages sold by one (1) wholesaler to another wholesaler shall be transported by common carrier or by vehicle owned or leased and operated by either the consignor wholesaler or the consignee wholesaler.

No manufacturer or distiller shall sell any alcoholic beverages to any person in this state except a licensed wholesaler and to another manufacturer or distiller, and no manufacturer shall hold a wholesaler's license.

No alcoholic beverage for sale to the retailer, or the retailer's representative, shall be sold except by a licensed wholesaler, who sells for resale on the wholesaler's premises and who carries on no other business, directly or indirectly, and whose wholesale business in alcoholic beverages is not operated as an adjunct to, or supplementary to, the business of any other person, either by way of lease of the wholesale premises or otherwise, for any business other than that permitted by the terms of such wholesaler's wholesale license.

Notwithstanding the limitations and restrictions imposed by this section, a wholesaler may invest its business assets in other businesses, and may engage in the sale and distribution of products other than alcoholic beverages; provided, that gross revenues from such other businesses and from the sale of products other than alcoholic beverages may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of a wholesaler's total gross revenues.

A licensed alcoholic beverages wholesaler may lawfully engage in activities covered by chapter 5 of this title, as provided by § 57-3-203(b)(2), without regard to the amount of gross revenues produced by such operation. Such wholesaler may, at the wholesaler's discretion, use the same warehouse and other facilities, vehicles and employees in both operations; provided, that all legal requirements applicable to such operations are satisfied with respect to each operation.

No retail licensee shall operate its business involving the sale of wine, beer or other alcoholic beverages in connection with the wholesale distribution of wine, beer or other alcoholic beverage nor shall such licensee sell its wine, beer or other alcoholic beverage for purposes of resale.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), beginning July 1, 2014, a retail licensee holding a license issued under § 57-3-204 shall be permitted to sell at retail beer and other malt beverages, subject to the restriction in [former] § 57-3-806(e). No permit or license other than the license issued pursuant to § 57-3-204 shall be required for the licensed retailer to engage in such sales of beer and other malt beverages and the issuer of that license has the authority to enforce any laws related to such sales.

A retail licensee shall be permitted to cash a check or other negotiable instrument for a fee when such service is made available to a person over twenty-one (21) years of age. No postdated check shall be cashed by a licensee under this section.

Beginning July 1, 2014, a retail licensee shall also be permitted to sell at retail items related to or incidental to the use, consumption, dispensing or storage of alcoholic beverages, together with merchandise and supplies related to special events or parties, subject to the restriction in [former] § 57-3-806(e). Such items may include, but are not limited to:

Newspapers, magazines, publications, videos and other media related to alcoholic beverages or food;

Utensils and supplies related or incidental to the use, consumption, dispensing or storage of alcoholic beverages, including, without limitation, corkscrews, beverage strainers, pourers, flasks, jiggers, stirrers, wine racks, wine refrigerators, wine cellars, decanters, carafes, glassware, ice crushers, bottle openers, can openers, and devices to maximize oxidation in uncorked wine bottles and other items used in connection with the consumption, storage or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;

Gift cards, packages and baskets that include alcoholic beverages and nonalcoholic items;

Nonalcoholic beverages;

Kegs and growlers, whether empty or filled with beer, wine or alcoholic beverages, on the licensed premises;

Concentrates and ingredients used in the preparation of mixed alcoholic beverages;

Beer and wine-making kits;

Products and supplies related to beer and wine-making;

Lemons, limes, cherries, olives and other food items used in the preparation or garnishment of alcoholic beverages or mixed alcoholic beverages;

Peanuts, pretzels, chips, cheese, crackers, appetizers and other snack foods;

Beverage coolers, ice chests and ice in any form;

Party supplies, party decorations, gift bags, greeting cards and other items for parties and special events;

Articles of clothing and accessories imprinted with advertising, logos, slogans, trademarks or messages related to alcoholic beverages;

Combined packages containing multiple alcoholic beverages;

Cigarettes, cigars and lighters and other smoking or tobacco related products; and

Lottery tickets if the retailer's application is approved by the Tennessee education lottery corporation as provided in § 4-51-115(e).

A retail licensee may sell nonalcoholic products to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age including gift cards.

No wholesale or retail store shall be located except on the ground floor, and it may have two (2) main entrances opening on a public street, and such place of business shall have no other entrance for use by the public except as hereafter provided. When a wholesale or retail store is located on the corner of two (2) public streets, such wholesale or retail store may maintain a door opening on each of the public streets. Any sales room adjoining the lobby of a hotel or other public building may maintain an additional door into such lobby so long as same shall be open to the public. Every wholesale and retail store shall be provided with whatever entrances and exits may be required by existing or future municipal ordinances. When the location of a wholesale or retail liquor store is authorized to be located or operated within an established shopping center or shopping mall, and such liquor store cannot and does not have a main entrance or door opening onto a public street, but the main entrance or door would open or front on a shopping center parking area, the commission in its discretion may approve the issuance of a liquor license to cover such location within the shopping center or shopping mall, irrespective of the fact that the main entrance or door does not or would not open onto a public street.

No holder of a license for the sale of alcoholic beverages for wholesale or retail shall sell, deliver, or cause, permit or procure to be sold or delivered, any alcoholic beverages on credit, except that holders of wholesale licenses may sell on not more than ten (10) days' credit.

The ten-day period begins from delivery and receipt by the retail licensee. The ten-day period cannot include any day that the wholesaler is not open to make deliveries, receive payment or receive mail.

Any suspension of deliveries is a credit decision to be made by a wholesaler and a retail licensee.

A wholesaler shall be permitted to communicate with another wholesaler about the account status of any retail licensee.

Wholesalers shall advise the commission of any failure of a retailer to comply with this subsection (g).

The commission shall be permitted to post the account status of a retail licensee with any wholesaler on its website.

This subsection (g) shall not apply to nonalcoholic products.

No alcoholic beverages shall be sold for consumption on the premises of the seller except as provided in §§ 57-4-101 — 57-4-203, and except as may be permitted by the regulations of the commission for the purpose of conducting consumer educational seminars by a licensee under § 57-3-204, conducted on the premises of a business licensed pursuant to §§ 57-4-101 — 57-4-203. A wholesaler licensed pursuant to § 57-3-203 or a person holding a permit as a representative or sales person pursuant to § 57-3-203(d) may conduct a sales demonstration on the premises of a licensed retailer and, for such limited purpose, may provide free samples to the employees of a licensed retailer for consumption on such premises. A retail licensee may conduct such a sales demonstration for the persons employed by such licensee holding permits issued pursuant to [former] § 57-3-204(c) using products and samples provided by a wholesaler or wholesaler sales representative notwithstanding the absence of the wholesaler or wholesaler sales representative. All such sales demonstrations permitted consumption shall be permitted only for sales, education, and promotional purposes and no one other than a retail licensee, a person holding a permit issued pursuant to [former]§ 57-3-204(c), a wholesaler or a wholesaler sales representative, or a person holding a permit issued pursuant to § 57-3-202(d) may be present in the room where such demonstration is conducted or may receive a sample for consumption.

A retail licensee may offer complimentary samples of the products it sells for tastings to be held on the premises of the retail licensee. Such tastings shall be for sales, education and promotional purposes. No person holding a license under § 57-3-203 shall, directly or indirectly, provide any products, funding, labor, support or reimbursement to a retailer for the consumer tastings authorized by this subdivision (h)(2).

The tastings may be held at the option of the retail licensee during the hours the retail licensee is open for business, without filing any notice other than as provided in subdivision (h)(2)(B)(ii) with the commission, and no charge or fee may be assessed by the commission for a retail licensee to offer such complimentary samples.

With its annual renewal, the retail licensee shall notify the commission of its intention to conduct tastings during the year on the premises of the retail licensee. If following the date the license is renewed, the retail licensee makes a determination to offer tastings, the licensee shall notify the commission of its intention to conduct tastings for the remainder of the year.

The size of each sample shall be no greater than approximately two ounces (2 oz.) for each wine or high alcohol content beer sample and no greater than approximately one-half ounce (½ oz.) for each liquor sample. It is the responsibility of the retail licensee to limit the number of tastings per customer and the number of products available for tasting.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a retail licensee or employee of the licensee may participate in tastings.

A server permit is not required for employees conducting tastings if the employee has a permit pursuant to § 57-3-703; provided, that every retail licensee which offers tastings is encouraged to ensure that any employee who is involved with the tastings understands that a violation of § 57-3-406(c) and (d) and § 57-3-412 related to retail sales apply equally to those customers who participate in the tastings.

A supplier may provide, through licensed wholesalers, products for tasting purposes by a retail licensee.

No wholesaler may provide a discount or other reduction in price to a retailer or retail food store wine licensee by virtue of the sales made to any other licensee. Any discount or pricing made available to a retailer or retail food store wine licensee shall be made available on the same terms and conditions to other retailers and food store wine licensees within the same jurisdiction. Any quantity discounts provided by wholesalers to any retailer licensed under this chapter or any licensee licensed under chapter 4 of this title cannot be cumulative in nature, but can be based only upon products delivered contemporaneously. No retail food store wine licensee may receive any remuneration, by whatever name, at a corporate office located inside or outside this state that affects the profitability of wine or beer sales in this state, that is not made available to all retail licensees or other retail food stores licensed to sell wine or beer in this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 5, 11, 14; 1945, ch. 48, § 1; 1945, ch. 167, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.15-6648.17 (Williams, §§ 6648.8, 6648.14, 6648.17); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 1A; 1967, ch. 211, § 2; 1970, ch. 469, § 2; 1971, ch. 72, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-140; Acts 1983, ch. 454, § 1; 1993, ch. 157, § 1; 1997, ch. 35, § 1; 1998, ch. 765, § 3; 2002, ch. 672, § 2; 2011, ch. 448, § 19; 2012, ch. 947, § 2; 2014, ch. 554, §§ 2, 10, 14, 17, 19, 26, 29; 2017, ch. 443, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Section 57-3-806(e), referred to in this section, was deleted by Acts 2016, ch. 1068, § 6.

Section 57-3-204(c), referred to in this section, expired effective July 1, 2016.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 8, 15, 28.

Attorney General Opinions. Licensed wholesalers of alcoholic beverages may extend up to 10 days’ credit to licensed retailers other than retail food store wine licensees. OAG 16-18, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (5/9/2016).

57-3-405. Solicitation of business restricted.

It is unlawful for any representative, employee, or agent of any distiller, rectifier or manufacturer, to solicit business from anyone in this state except those holding a wholesaler's license to do business in this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 12, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.16, 6648.19 (Williams, §§ 6648.15, 6648.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-141; Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 31.

57-3-406. Regulation of retail sales.

Except for retailers licensed under § 57-3-204, no person, corporation or other entity shall, directly or indirectly, operate any licensed retail establishment selling alcoholic spirituous beverages, not including wine, for off-premises consumption in this state.

“Indirectly” means any kind of interest in such a retail business by way of stock ownership, loan, partner's interest or otherwise.

A landlord shall be deemed to have an indirect interest in such a retail business when the lease agreement is based upon a percentage of profits or any other factor based upon sales of alcoholic beverages by the tenant as distinguished from being simply an interest in land for a period of time at a definite rate.

Except as provided in this subsection (a), nothing shall prohibit the holder of a retail license from having more than one (1) retail license; provided, however, that the holder of a retail license shall not have more than two (2) retail licenses. If the commission has issued more than two (2) licenses to any person prior to April 12, 2016, such person shall be allowed to continue to have all such licenses and may renew all such licenses.

In any municipality or county in which the issuance of two (2) or more retail licenses have been authorized under § 57-3-208(c), no retail licensee shall hold more than fifty percent (50%) of the licenses authorized for issuance in such municipality or county.

For five (5) years beginning January 1, 2014, no retail license shall be issued to any applicant for a new location that is within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of an existing operating establishment holding a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-204 as of July 1, 2014, (an “existing licensed premises”) if the applicant for such new retail license already holds one (1) or more retail licenses issued under § 57-3-204, unless the commission receives the written consent from each retail licensee owning an existing licensed premises within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of such new location. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the holder of one (1) or more retail licenses issued under § 57-3-204 may purchase the business or assets of an existing licensed premises and obtain a retail license to operate such existing licensed premises, as the same may be expanded or modified, from time to time. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(4) shall be deemed to prohibit a retailer licensed under § 57-3-204 from obtaining a new or replacement license in connection with the relocation of an existing licensed premises, as long as the new location is within the jurisdiction of the municipality or county issuing the certificate required under § 57-3-208 for such existing licensed premises.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a retailer from offering a discount in such manner as the retailer deems appropriate as long as the discount being offered is not below the cost paid by the retailer to purchase the alcoholic beverages from the wholesaler.

No retailer shall sell any alcoholic beverages or beer to any person who is visibly intoxicated, nor shall any retailer selling alcoholic beverages or beer sell to any person accompanied by a person who is visibly intoxicated.

A retailer or any employee thereof shall not make or permit to be made any sales of alcoholic beverages or beer to minors. Prior to making a sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption, the adult consumer whose physical appearance does not reasonably demonstrate an age of fifty (50) years or older must present to the retailer or any employee of the retailer a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver license or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the retailer that includes the photograph and birth date of the adult consumer attempting to make an alcoholic beverage purchase. Persons exempt under state law from the requirement of having a photo identification shall present identification that is acceptable to the retailer. The retailer or employee shall make a determination from the information presented whether the purchaser is an adult. In addition to the prohibition of making a sale to a minor, no sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption shall be made to a person whose physical appearance does not reasonably demonstrate an age of fifty (50) years or older who does not present such a document or other form of identification to the license holder or any employee of the license holder in a face-to-face transaction.

A violation of subdivision (d)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

The commission may, upon finding that a licensee has violated subdivision (d)(1) two (2) or more times during any two-year period, and for good cause shown, fine the licensee not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and require retraining of all employees of the licensee under the supervision of the commission in lieu of suspending or revoking the license of the licensee.

No retail store shall sell, give away, or otherwise dispense alcoholic beverages except between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Monday through Saturday and between ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Sunday.

Except as provided in § 57-3-404(e)(4)(E), no retailer of alcoholic beverages shall keep or permit to be kept upon the licensed premises any alcoholic beverages in any unsealed bottles or other unsealed containers except such open bottles and containers of damaged and unmarketable product retained by the retail licensee for purpose of return to a wholesaler or such open bottles and containers required for conducting a sales demonstration as permitted by § 57-3-404(h).

No retailer as herein defined shall own, store or possess upon the licensed premises any merchandise unless the retailer shall also possess such documentation as prescribed by the commission to demonstrate that the taxes imposed in this chapter have been paid. No retailer may store any alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer at any location other than the licensed premises and the retailer shall not hold, store, or accept delivery of any products intended for another retailer.

Notwithstanding subsection (e), a retailer shall not sell or give away any alcoholic beverages on Christmas, Thanksgiving, or Easter.

No retail food store shall keep, or permit to be kept, upon the licensed premises any wine in any unsealed bottles or other unsealed containers except such open bottles and containers of damaged and unmarketable product retained by the retail food store for purpose of return to a wholesaler. This subsection (i) shall not apply to the premises within a retail food store that has a license under chapter 4 of this title.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, retailers licensed under § 57-3-204 are authorized, for a fee or without a fee, to provide, within the state, consulting services related to alcoholic beverages and to the products, merchandise, and supplies that the retailer is authorized to sell under § 57-3-404(e), and may supply, sell, deliver, and install products authorized to be sold by the retailer to locations outside of the licensed premises.

Any licensee making a delivery of alcohol, wine, or beer is subject to subsections (c) and (d) except that no person receiving delivery of alcohol, wine, or beer shall be required to purchase such items at the physical location of the retailer. The licensee shall require a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver license or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the retailer that includes the photograph and birth date of the person receiving the delivery and that shall be deemed sufficient to meet the requirements of this subdivision (j)(2) and subsection (d). A record of all deliveries shall be maintained in writing and must contain all information concerning the recipient, products delivered, the time of delivery, and place of delivery.

Any delivery made by a retailer pursuant to this subsection (j) must be made only to the physical address indicated by the individual placing the delivery order. The delivery must be documented by a verification of the delivery signed by the recipient.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (k)(3), notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a delivery service that delivers prepared food from restaurants or food from a retailer to customers as part of the delivery service's business is authorized to deliver sealed packages of alcoholic beverages or beer or both sold by a retailer licensed under § 57-3-204 to the delivery service's customers and to deliver sealed packages of beer sold by an off-premise retail permittee licensed under § 57-5-103 to the delivery service's customers during the hours that these products may legally be sold if:

The amount of alcoholic beverages or beer delivered to a customer is in such an amount to satisfy the customer's order; provided, however, if an amount ordered exceeds two gallons (2 gal.), then the delivery driver shall have available for inspection by a commission representative or other law enforcement official, a copy of the customer's order indicating the:

Name of the customer and the name of the recipient of the alcoholic beverages or beer;

Address where the alcoholic beverages or beer is to be delivered; and

Amount of the alcoholic beverages or beer to be delivered;

At least fifty percent (50%) of the delivery service's gross sales come from the delivery of food products or prepared food;

Any delivery service employee who delivers alcoholic beverages or beer is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is licensed pursuant to § 57-3-225;

The delivery service is licensed pursuant to § 57-3-224;

The delivery service has a written agreement with the retailer or permittee to deliver the retailer's or permittee's alcoholic beverages or beer to customers;

Any delivery service employee, who delivers alcoholic beverages or beer, requires the customer to show a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver license or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the employee that includes the photograph and birth date of the customer before the customer is allowed possession of the alcoholic beverages or beer; and

Any delivery made by a delivery service is made only to the physical address indicated by the individual placing the delivery order. The delivery must be documented by a verification of the delivery signed by the recipient.

A delivery service described in subdivision (k)(1) shall not be prohibited from charging a fee either to customers, retailers, or beer permittees with whom the delivery service has previously entered into a written agreement as required by subdivision (k)(1)(E) when delivering sealed packages of alcoholic beverages or beer sold by a retailer or beer permittee.

If a delivery service is delivering alcoholic beverages or beer purchased from a retailer in accordance with subdivision (k)(1), the delivery service shall not deliver the alcoholic beverages or beer to a customer who resides or is located at the time of the delivery at a distance greater than one hundred (100) miles from the licensed premises of the retailer at which the alcoholic beverages or beer was purchased.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 11, 12; 1943, ch. 99, § 1; 1945, ch. 167, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.15, 6648.16 (Williams, §§ 6648.14, 6648.15); Acts 1970, ch. 469, § 3; 1970, ch. 518, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-142; Acts 1981, ch. 479, § 1; 1984, ch. 746, § 2; 1992, ch. 608, § 8; 1995, ch. 223, § 1; 2002, ch. 672, § 1; 2009, ch. 208, § 1; 2012, ch. 947, § 4; 2014, ch. 554, §§ 8, 9, 12, 18, 28; 2014, ch. 861, § 16; 2015, ch. 285, § 1; 2015, ch. 428, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 787, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 898, § 2; 2016, ch. 1045, §§ 5-8; 2016, ch. 1068, §§ 4, 5; 2018, ch. 765, § 5; 2018, ch. 783, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 933, §§ 1, 2, 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 765 inserted “or food from a retailer” in the introductory language of (k)(1).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 783 rewrote (e) which read, “No retailer shall sell or give away any alcoholic beverage between eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Saturday and eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) on Monday of each week. No retail store shall sell, give away or otherwise dispense alcoholic beverages except between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Monday through Saturday. The store may not be open to the general public except during regular business hours. Likewise, all retail liquor stores shall be closed for business on Thanksgiving Day and Christmas Day.” and rewrote (h) which read, “No retailer shall sell or give away any alcoholic beverages on the following holidays: Christmas, Thanksgiving, Labor Day, New Year's Day and the Fourth of July.”

The 2018 amendment by ch. 933 added the last sentence in (g); and added (j)(3) and (k)(1)(G).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 765, § 8. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14. April 20, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 933, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 8, 9, 12, 15.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).

Sunday, the Sabbath, and the Blue Laws (Donald Franklin Paine), 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 249.

Attorney General Opinions. Hours for the sale of beer in a municipality located within a Tennessee River resort district. OAG 10-92, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (8/17/10).

The statutory provisions that prohibit retail sales by Tennessee liquor stores on Sundays and holidays but permit Tennessee distilleries to make retail sales on Sundays and holidays do not violate the Commerce Clause or equal protection guarantees. OAG 16-08, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (3/1/2016).

57-3-407. Action against commission — Venue.

Any action brought against the commission as such shall be brought in the circuit court of Davidson County.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 41; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-143.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.